Washington statutes.
RCW 26.19.045

Veterans' disability pensions, compensation for disability, and aid and attendant care payments.

Veterans' disability pensions or regular compensation for disability incurred in or aggravated by service in the United States armed forces paid by the veterans' administration shall be disclosed to the court. The court may consider either type of compensation as disposable income for purposes of calculating the child support obligation. Aid and attendant care payments to prevent hospitalization paid by the veterans' administration solely to provide physical home care for a disabled veteran, and special medical compensation paid under 38 U.S.C. Sec. 314 (k) through (r) to provide either special care or special aids, or both, to assist with routine daily functions shall also be disclosed. The court may not include either aid and attendant care or special medical compensation payments in gross income for purposes of calculating the child support obligation or for purposes of deviating from the standard calculation.

[ 1991 c 367 s 30.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 c 367: See notes following RCW 26.09.015.